Arkansas, session 2025, SB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-93-402(1), concerning the definition of
"athlete" within the Arkansas Athletic Trainers Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(1) “Athlete” means an individual who is participating in
organized athletic or team activities at the interscholastic, intramural,
intercollegiate, or professional level, or sanctioned recreational sports
activities activities related to recreation, sport, exercise, or tactical
duty;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-93-402(1), concerning the definition of
"direct supervision" within the Arkansas Athletic Trainers Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(6) “Direct supervision” means supervision of the athletic
trainer in a clinical setting by the supervising physical therapist or
*JMB197*
01/23/2025 11:54:04 AM JMB197

SB95
physician who is readily available for consultation for the care of the
athlete and is on the premises;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-93-402, concerning the definitions
within the Arkansas Athletic Trainers Act, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(10) "Tactical duty" means activities associated with law
enforcement, military, or rescue services.




























01/23/2025 11:54:04 AM JMB197